fi: Turvavyön lukon sähköliittimen tyyppi: 2-napainen; 3-napainen; 4-napainen; 5-napainen; 6-napainen; Ei mitään (ei sähköä); OEM-kohtainen; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta električnega priključka zaponke varnostnega pasu: 2-pinski; 3-pinski; 4-pinski; 5-pinski; 6-pinski; Brez (ni električno); Specifično za OEM; Drugo
cs: Typ elektrického konektoru spony bezpečnostního pásu: 2pinový; 3pinový; 4pinový; 5pinový; 6pinový; Žádný (bez elektrického připojení); Specifické pro OEM; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип електрически конектор за катарамата на предпазния колан: 2-пинов; 3-пинов; 4-пинов; 5-пинов; 6-пинов; Няма (без електрически); Специфичен за OEM; Други
es: Tipo de conector eléctrico de la hebilla del cinturón de seguridad: 2 pines; 3 pines; 4 pines; 5 pines; 6 pines; Ninguno (sin sistema eléctrico); Específico del OEM; Otro
el: Τύπος ηλεκτρικής σύνδεσης της πόρπης της ζώνης ασφαλείας: 2 ακίδων; 3 ακίδων; 4 ακίδων; 5 ακίδων; 6 ακίδων; Κανένα (χωρίς ηλεκτρικά); Ειδικό για OEM; Άλλο
nb: Elektrisk tilkoblingstype for sikkerhetsbeltespenne: 2-pinners; 3-pinners; 4-pinners; 5-pinners; 6-pinners; Ingen (ikke elektrisk); OEM-spesifikk; Annet
th: ขั้วต่อไฟฟ้าแบบหัวเข็มขัดนิรภัย: 2 พิน; 3 พิน; 4 พิน; 5 พิน; 6 พิน; ไม่มี (ไม่ใช้ไฟฟ้า); เฉพาะสำหรับ OEM; อื่นๆ
en: Seat belt buckle electrical connector type: 2-pin; 3-pin; 4-pin; 5-pin; 6-pin; None (no electrical); OEM-specific; Other
pl: Typ elektrycznego złącza klamry pasa bezpieczeństwa: 2-pinowe; 3-pinowe; 4-pinowe; 5-pinowe; 6-pinowe; Brak (bez elektroniki); Specyficzne dla OEM; Inne
sv: Typ av elektrisk anslutning för säkerhetsbältesspänne: 2-stifts; 3-stifts; 4-stifts; 5-stifts; 6-stifts; Ingen (ingen el); OEM-specifik; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de conector elétrico da fivela do cinto de segurança: 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 4 pinos; 5 pinos; 6 pinos; Nenhum (sem eletricidade); Específico de OEM; Outro
it: Tipo di connettore elettrico della fibbia della cintura di sicurezza: A 2 pin; A 3 pin; A 4 pin; A 5 pin; A 6 pin; Nessuno (non elettrico); Specifico OEM; Altro
de: Elektrischer Steckertyp des Sicherheitsgurtschlosses: 2-polig; 3-polig; 4-polig; 5-polig; 6-polig; Kein (ohne Elektronik); OEM-spezifisch; Sonstige
ru: Тип электрического разъема замка ремня безопасности: 2-контактный; 3-контактный; 4-контактный; 5-контактный; 6-контактный; Нет (без электрики); Специфичный для OEM; Другое
hr-HR: Kopča sigurnosnog pojasa električni mehanizam sinkronizacije tipa: 2-pinski; 3-pinski; 4-pinski; 5-pinski; 6-pinski; Nema (bez struje); Specifično za OEM; Ostalo
lt-LT: Saugos diržo sagties elektros jungties tipas: 2 kontaktų; 3 kontaktų; 4 kontaktų; 5 kontaktų; 6 kontaktų; Nėra (neelektrinė); Specifinis OEM; Kita
zh-TW: 安全帶扣電氣接頭類型: 2 針; 3 針; 4 針; 5 針; 6 針; 無 (非電子); OEM 專用; 其他
zh-CN: 安全带锁扣电气连接器类型: 2 针脚; 3 针脚; 4 针脚; 5 针脚; 6 针脚; 无（无电气接口）; OEM 专用; 其他
ja: シートベルトバックル電気コネクタータイプ: 2ピン; 3ピン; 4ピン; 5ピン; 6ピン; なし (電気コネクタなし); OEM専用; その他
vi: Loại đầu nối điện của khóa dây an toàn: 2 chân; 3 chân; 4 chân; 5 chân; 6 chân; Không có (không dùng điện); Đặc thù của OEM; Khác
tr: Emniyet kemeri tokası elektrik konnektör tipi: 2 pimli; 3 pimli; 4 pimli; 5 pimli; 6 pimli; Yok (elektriksiz); OEM'e özel; Diğer
pt-BR: Cinto de segurança tipo de conector elétrico da fivela: 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 4 pinos; 5 pinos; 6 pinos; Nenhum (sem eletricidade); Específico do OEM; Outros
nl: Veiligheidsgordel gesp elektrisch connectortype: 2-pins; 3-pins; 4-pins; 5-pins; 6-pins; Geen (niet-elektrisch); OEM-specifiek; Overig
fr: Type de connecteur électrique de la boucle de ceinture: 2 broches; 3 broches; 4 broches; 5 broches; 6 broches; Aucun (pas électrique); Spécifique OEM; Autre
ko: 안전벨트 버클 전기 커넥터 유형: 2핀; 3핀; 4핀; 5핀; 6핀; 없음(전기 연결 없음); OEM 전용; 기타
da: Sikkerhedsselespændes elektriske forbindelseskomponenttype: 2-pin; 3-pin; 4-pin; 5-pin; 6-pin; Ingen (ikke elektrisk); OEM-specifik; Andet
sk-SK: Typ elektrického konektora spony bezpečnostného pásu: 2-kolíkové; 3-kolíkové; 4-kolíkové; 5-kolíkové; 6-kolíkové; Žiadne (bez elektriky); Špecifické pre OEM; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de conector electric pentru catarama centurii de siguranță: 2 pini; 3 pini; 4 pini; 5 pini; 6 pini; Fără (fără parte electrică); Specific OEM; Altele
hu: Biztonsági öv csatjának elektromos csatlakozótípusa: 2 tűs; 3 tűs; 4 tűs; 5 tűs; 6 tűs; Nincs (nem elektromos); OEM-specifikus; Egyéb